Colorado, session 2026A, HB1139.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Health-care decisions affect the most intimate, complex, and
consequential aspects of human life, including physical survival, mental
well-being, family stability, and personal dignity, and therefore must be
grounded in compassion, clinical judgment, and individualized
understanding;
(b) Artificial intelligence systems may offer valuable tools to
support efficiency, data analysis, and administrative functions in health-care
delivery; however, these systems cannot comprehend the full breadth and
depth of the human experience, including trauma, culture, disability, grief,
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

fear, hope, and the lived realities that shape patient health outcomes;
(c) The state of Colorado has a compelling interest in ensuring that
health care remains human-centered and that decisions involving coverage
determinations, medical necessity, and access to treatment, particularly
denials of care, are made by qualified human clinicians or physicians who
are accountable for these decisions and can exercise professional judgment
and ethical reasoning;
(d) Reliance on artificial intelligence systems to make or materially
influence adverse health-care determinations without meaningful human
oversight risks compounding inequities, embedding bias, and eroding trust
between patients, providers, and health-care systems;
(e) Artificial intelligence systems may be used as an assistive tool
in health-care delivery and administration but must not replace human
judgment, human accountability, or the therapeutic relationship that is
essential to safe, ethical, and effective care; and
(f) Every Coloradan, regardless of income, insurance status,
disability, language access needs, race, ethnicity, geography, or immigration
status, deserves access to human-centered health care that recognizes their
dignity, individuality, and humanity.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that it is essential to:
(a) Regulate the use of artificial intelligence systems in health care
to ensure transparency, accountability, equity, and patient safety;
(b) Prohibit automated systems from making adverse coverage
determinations without qualified human review; and
(c) Preserve the central role of licensed clinicians in decisions that
affect the health, well-being, and lives of Coloradans.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 10-16-112.7 as
follows:
10-16-112.7. Use of artificial intelligence systems - utilization
review - prohibition on payment for AI-delivered psychotherapy
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1139

services - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION:
(a) "ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 6-1-1701 (2).
(b) "BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
ORGANIZATION" MEANS AN ORGANIZATION SELECTED BY THE BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH ADMINISTRATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-50-402 TO ESTABLISH
AND MAINTAIN A NETWORK OF BEHAVIORAL HEATH PROVIDERS.
(c) "MANAGED CARE ENTITY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 25.5-5-403 (4).
(d) "PRIVATE UTILIZATION REVIEW ORGANIZATION" OR
"ORGANIZATION" MEANS A PRIVATE UTILIZATION REVIEW ORGANIZATION, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 10-16-112 (1)(a), THAT HAS A CONTRACT WITH OR
PERFORMS PRIOR AUTHORIZATION ON BEHALF OF A CARRIER.
(2) Utilization review. SUBSECTIONS (3), (4), AND (5) OF THIS
SECTION APPLY TO:
(a) A CARRIER THAT:
(I) USES AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM FOR THE PURPOSE OF
UTILIZATION REVIEW; OR
(II) CONTRACTS WITH OR OTHERWISE WORKS THROUGH A PERSON
THAT USES AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM FOR THE PURPOSE OF
UTILIZATION REVIEW;
(b) A PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER OR PRIVATE UTILIZATION
REVIEW ORGANIZATION THAT CONTRACTS WITH A CARRIER TO PROVIDE
UTILIZATION REVIEW SERVICES ON BEHALF OF THE CARRIER AND USES AN
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONDUCTING THE
UTILIZATION REVIEW; AND
(c) A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
ORGANIZATION OR MANAGED CARE ENTITY THAT USES AN ARTIFICIAL
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1139

INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONDUCTING UTILIZATION
REVIEW OF MENTAL OR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES.
(3) A PERSON DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION THAT
USES AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM TO CONDUCT UTILIZATION
REVIEW SHALL ENSURE THAT:
(a) THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM BASES ITS
DETERMINATION ON THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION, AS APPLICABLE:
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL'S MEDICAL OR OTHER CLINICAL HISTORY;
(II) INDIVIDUAL CLINICAL CIRCUMSTANCES AS PRESENTED BY THE
REQUESTING PROVIDER; AND
(III) OTHER RELEVANT CLINICAL INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THE
INDIVIDUAL'S MEDICAL OR OTHER CLINICAL RECORD;
(b) THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM DOES NOT BASE ITS
DETERMINATIONS SOLELY ON GROUP DATA, WITHOUT REFERENCE TO THE
INDIVIDUAL'S DATA;
(c) THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS NOT USED IN ANY WAY
THAT DISCRIMINATES AGAINST INDIVIDUALS IN VIOLATION OF OTHER STATE
OR FEDERAL LAWS;
(d) THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS FAIRLY AND EQUITABLY
APPLIED, INCLUDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE REGULATIONS AND
GUIDANCE ISSUED BY THE FEDERAL DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES;
(e) THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM PRODUCES AND RETAINS
DOCUMENTATION, AUDIT LOGS, AND MODEL-GOVERNANCE RECORDS IN
ORDER TO DEMONSTRATE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION AND SECTION
10-3-1104.9;
(f) THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM'S PERFORMANCE, USE,
AND OUTCOMES ARE PERIODICALLY REVIEWED TO MAXIMIZE ACCURACY AND
RELIABILITY;
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1139

(g) AN INDIVIDUAL'S HEALTH DATA IS NOT USED BEYOND ITS
INTENDED OR STATED PURPOSE, CONSISTENT WITH APPLICABLE STATE AND
FEDERAL LAWS; AND
(h) THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM'S OR ALGORITHM'S
CRITERIA AND GUIDELINES COMPLY WITH OTHER APPLICABLE STATE OR
FEDERAL LAWS CONCERNING UTILIZATION REVIEW AND COVERAGE FOR
HEALTH-CARE SERVICES.
(4) A PERSON DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
PROVIDE WRITTEN DISCLOSURES TO THE DIVISION, THE DEPARTMENT OF
HUMAN SERVICES, OR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND
FINANCING, AS APPLICABLE, THAT IDENTIFY:
(a) THE UTILIZATION REVIEW FUNCTIONS FOR WHICH THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM WILL BE USED;
(b) THE POINTS IN THE UTILIZATION REVIEW PROCESS WHEN THE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM IS USED;
(c) THE HUMAN OVERSIGHT PROCESS, INCLUDING THE
QUALIFICATIONS OF THE REVIEWER AND WHETHER A HUMAN MUST APPROVE
AN ADVERSE DETERMINATION; AND
(d) THE PROCESS FOR MAINTAINING AUDIT INFORMATION SUFFICIENT
TO DEMONSTRATE COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION.
(5) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION, AN
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM MAY BE USED TO ASSIST WITH
UTILIZATION REVIEW, INCLUDING EXPEDITED APPROVALS.
(b) A CARRIER'S DENIAL OF COVERAGE BASED IN WHOLE OR IN PART
ON MEDICAL NECESSITY SHALL NOT BE ISSUED SOLELY ON THE OUTPUT OF AN
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM WITHOUT HUMAN REVIEW AND APPROVAL
OF THE DENIAL BY A LICENSED CLINICIAN, LICENSED PHYSICIAN, OR OTHER
REGULATED PROFESSIONAL THAT IS COMPETENT TO EVALUATE THE SPECIFIC
CLINICAL ISSUES INVOLVED IN THE HEALTH-CARE SERVICES REQUESTED BY
THE PROVIDER AND A REVIEW OF THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN'S TERMS OF
COVERAGE FOR THE HEALTH-CARE SERVICE.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1139

(6) Prohibition on payment for AI-delivered psychotherapy
services.
(a) A CARRIER OFFERING A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN ISSUED OR
RENEWED IN THE STATE ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION
SHALL NOT PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR SERVICES THAT CONSTITUTE
PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 12-245-202 (14), THAT
ARE PROVIDED DIRECTLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL AND THAT ARE CONDUCTED BY
AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM.
(b) SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT THE USE
OF BILLING SOFTWARE, ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORDS, VIDEO PLATFORMS,
OR OTHER NONTHERAPEUTIC SOFTWARE TOOLS INCIDENT TO SERVICES
PROVIDED BY A HUMAN PROVIDER.
(c) THE USE OF VIDEOCONFERENCING, MESSAGING PLATFORMS, OR
OTHER COMMUNICATIONS SOFTWARE TO ENABLE SUPERVISION OR
CONSULTATION BY A LICENSED, REGISTERED, OR CERTIFIED INDIVIDUAL DOES
NOT CONSTITUTE SUPERVISION OR CONSULTATION THAT IS CONDUCTED BY
AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, AS REFERENCED IN SUBSECTION (6)(a)
OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-1-209 as
follows:
25.5-1-209. Prohibition on payment for AI-delivered
psychotherapy services.
A PAYER OF MENTAL OR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH-CARE SERVICES
PROVIDED UNDER THE "COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE ACT", AS
SPECIFIED IN ARTICLES 4, 5, AND 6 OF THIS TITLE 25.5, OR THE "CHILDREN'S
BASIC HEALTH PLAN ACT", AS SPECIFIED IN ARTICLE 8 OF THIS TITLE 25.5,
SHALL NOT PAY FOR SERVICES THAT CONSTITUTE PSYCHOTHERAPY SERVICES,
AS DEFINED IN SECTION 12-245-202 (14), THAT ARE PROVIDED DIRECTLY TO
AN INDIVIDUAL AND THAT ARE CONDUCTED BY AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM, AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 10-16-112.7 (1)(b).
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect January 1, 2027; except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1139

constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly, then the
act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people
at the general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will
take effect January 1, 2027, or on the date of the official declaration of the
vote thereon by the governor, whichever is later.
(2) This act applies to actions taken on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1139